hu: Baba- és csecsemő: Babafürdetés; Babaajándék-készletek; Babaegészség; Bababiztonság; Babajátékok és -tevékenységfelszerelések; Babaszállítás; Babaszállítási kiegészítők; Babaszállító-cserealkatrészek; Pelenkázás; Szoptatás és etetés; Biliképzés; Pólyázó és köszöntő takarók
es: Bebés y niños pequeños: Baño de bebés; Conjuntos de regalo para bebés; Salud del bebé; Protección para el bebé; Juguetes y actividades para bebés; Transporte de bebés; Accesorios para el transporte de bebés; Piezas de repuesto para transporte de bebés; Pañales y cuidado del bebé; Lactancia y alimentación; Control de esfínteres; Sacos y mantas para bebés
pt-PT: Bebé e criança: Banho do bebé; Conjuntos de oferta para bebé; Saúde do bebé; Segurança do bebé; Equipamento de atividade e brinquedos para bebé; Transporte do bebé; Acessórios de transporte para bebé; Peças de reposição para transporte de bebés; Ornamentação; Amamentação e alimentação; Treino do penico; Faixas e cobertores de receção
zh-TW: 嬰幼兒: 嬰兒沐浴; 嬰兒禮盒; 嬰兒照護; 嬰兒安全; 嬰兒玩具和嬰兒活動設備; 嬰兒外出用品; 嬰兒外出用品配件; 嬰兒車替換零件; 尿布; 哺育和餵食; 大小便訓練; 嬰兒包巾
hr-HR: Bebe i mala djeca: Kupanje bebe; Poklon setovi za bebe; Zdravlje bebe; Sigurnost bebe; Dječje igračke i oprema; Prijevoz za bebe; Pribor za prijevoz beba; Zamjenski dijelovi za prijevoz beba; Pelenaštvo; Dojenje i hranjenje; Odvikavanje od pelena; Deke za povijanje i nošenje beba
pl: Dzieci i niemowlęta: Kąpanie niemowlęcia; Zestawy prezentów dla dzieci i niemowląt; Zdrowie niemowląt; Bezpieczeństwo niemowląt; Zabawki dla niemowląt; Transport niemowląt; Akcesoria do transportu niemowląt; Części zamienne do transportu niemowląt; Przewijanie; Karmienie; Trening czystości; Beciki i kocyki niemowlęce
lt-LT: Kūdikiai ir maži vaikai: Kūdikių maudymas; Dovanų kūdikiams rinkiniai; Kūdikių sveikata; Kūdikių sauga; Kūdikių žaislai ir veiklos įranga; Kūdikių transportas; Kūdikių transportavimo priemonių priedai; Kūdikių transportavimo priemonių atsarginės dalys; Vystymas; Žindymas ir maitinimas; Pratinimas prie puoduko; Vystymo antklodės ir antklodės naujagimiams
th: ทารกและเด็กเล็ก: การอาบน้ำเด็กทารก; ชุดของขวัญสำหรับทารก; สุขภาพทารก; อุปกรณ์ความปลอดภัยสำหรับทารก; อุปกรณ์ของเล่นและกิจกรรมสำหรับเด็กทารก; การเคลื่อนย้ายเด็กทารก; อุปกรณ์เคลื่อนย้ายเด็กอ่อน; ชิ้นส่วนอะไหล่สำหรับเคลื่อนย้ายเด็กอ่อน; การเปลี่ยนผ้าอ้อม; การให้นม; ฝึกเด็กนั่งกระโถน; ผ้าห่มตัวทารก
tr: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Ürünleri: Bebek Banyo Malzemeleri; Bebek Hediyesi Takımları; Bebek Sağlığı; Bebek Güvenliği; Bebek Oyuncakları ve Aktivite Gereçleri; Bebek Taşıma Ürünleri; Bebek Taşıma Aksesuarları; Bebek Arabası Yedek Parçaları; Bebek Alt Alma Ürünleri; Emzirme ve Beslenme; Tuvalet Eğitimi; Kundaklar
el: Βρεφικά & παιδικά είδη: Βρεφικό μπάνιο; Βρεφικά σετ δώρων; Υγεία μωρού; Βρεφική ασφάλεια; Βρεφικά παιχνίδια και εξοπλισμός δραστηριοτήτων; Μεταφορά βρέφους; Αξεσουάρ μεταφοράς μωρών; Ανταλλακτικά για μεταφορά βρέφους; Αλλαγή πάνας; Θηλασμός & σίτιση; Εκπαίδευση με χρήση γιογιό; Κουβέρτες φασκιώματος & υποδοχής
en: Baby & Toddler: Baby Bathing; Baby Gift Sets; Baby Health; Baby Safety; Baby Toys & Activity Equipment; Baby Transport; Baby Transport Accessories; Baby Transport Replacement Parts; Diapering; Nursing & Feeding; Potty Training; Swaddling & Receiving Blankets
it: Bebè e bimbi: Bagnetto; Set da regalo per neonato e primi passi; Salute del bambino; Sicurezza dei bebè; Attrezzature per attività e giochi per bebè; Trasporto bebè; Accessori trasporto bebè; Parti di ricambio per il trasporto del bebè; Cambio pannolini; Allattamento e alimentazione; Addestramento al vasino; Coperte per fasciatura
ko: 영유아: 아기 목욕 용품; 출산 선물 세트; 영유아 위생용품; 영유아 안전용품; 아기 장난감/운동용품; 영유아용 캐리어; 영유아용 캐리어 부대용품; 영유아용 캐리어 교체용 부품; 기저귀용품; 수유/이유식 용품; 배변 훈련; 속싸개 담요
sv: Baby och småbarn: Babybad; Babypresentset; Hälsovård spädbarn; Babysäkerhet; Bebisleksaker och aktivitetsutrustning; Barntransport; Tillbehör till barntransport; Reservdelar för babytransportör; Blöjbyte; Amning och matning; Potträning; Lindningsfiltar och bebisfiltar
ro-RO: Bebeluși și copii mici: Baia copilului; Seturi de cadouri pentru bebeluși; Sănătatea bebelușului; Siguranța bebelușului; Jucării pentru copii și echipamente pentru activități; Transportul bebelușilor; Accesorii pentru transportul bebelușilor; Piese de schimb pentru transportul bebelușilor; Articole scutece; Alăptare și hrănire; Antrenamentul la oliță; Pături pentru înfășare și primire
bg-BG: Бебета и малки деца: Продукти за баня; Подаръчни комплекти за бебета; Бебешко здраве; Безопасност на бебето; Бебешки играчки и игри за активно развитие; Бебешки транспорт; Бебешки транспортни аксесоари; Резервни части за колички и други аксесоари; Смяна на пелени; Кърмене и хранене; Приучаване към гърне; Одеяла за повиване и изписване
sl-SI: Dojenčki in malčki: Kopanje dojenčka; Darilni kompleti za dojenčke; Zdravje dojenčka; Varnost dojenčka; Otroške igrače in oprema za razvoj motoričnih sposobnosti; Prevoz otrok; Dodatki za prevoz otrok; Nadomestni deli za prevoz otrok; Previjanje; Dojenje in hranjenje; Učenje uporabe kahlice; Odeje za povijanje in tetra odeje
pt-BR: Infantil: Banho de bebês; Conjuntos de presentes para bebês e crianças de colo; Saúde do bebê; Segurança de bebês; Brinquedos para bebês; Transporte de bebês; Acessórios para transporte de bebês; Peças de reposição para transporte de bebês; Troca de fraldas; Amamentação e alimentação; Desfralde; Cueiros para enrolar bebês
nl: Baby en peuter: Baby in bad; Geschenkensets voor baby's en peuters; Gezondheidszorg voor baby's; Babyveiligheid; Babyspeelgoed; Baby's vervoeren; Accessoires voor vervoeren van baby's; Vervangende onderdelen voor babyvervoer; Luiermaterialen; Borstvoeding en voeding; Zindelijkheidstraining; Inbaker- en omslagdoeken
nb: Baby og barn: Babybad; Gavesett for baby; Babyhelse; Babysikkerhet; Babyleker og aktivitetsutstyr; Babytransport; Tilbehør for babytransport; Reservedeler for babytransport; Bleieutstyr; Amming og mating; Pottetrening; Bæresjal og babypledd
fr: Bébés et tout-petits: Accessoires de bain pour bébés; Coffrets cadeaux pour bébés; Puériculture; Accessoires de sécurité pour bébés; Jouets pour bébés et équipement d’éveil; Transport de bébés; Accessoires de transport pour bébés; Pièces de rechange pour le transport de bébés; Change de bébé; Allaitement et alimentation; Apprentissage de la propreté; Couvertures d’emmaillotage et couvertures pour bébés
da: Baby og småbørn: Babybad; Baby og småbørn – gavesæt; Babysundhed; Baby – sikkerhedsudstyr; Babylegetøj; Babytransport; Babytransport – tilbehør; Reservedele til babytransport; Bleskift; Amning og madning; Pottetræning; Babysvøb og -tæpper
vi: Trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ tập đi: Sữa tắm trẻ em; Bộ quà tặng em bé sơ sinh; Sản phẩm sức khỏe dành cho em bé; An toàn cho bé; Đồ chơi trẻ em & thiết bị hoạt động; Xe đẩy cho trẻ em; Xe đẩy trẻ em; Phụ tùng thay thế của phương tiện di chuyển cho em bé; Tã/bỉm; Cho con bú và cho ăn; Dạy bé ngồi bô; Chăn mền quấn em bé
ru: Товары для детей: Купание детей; Наборы подарков для младенцев; Здоровье детей; Безопасность детей; Детские игрушки и товары для активного развития; Прогулки и путешествия с детьми; Аксессуары для детских автокресел, переносок и колясок; Комплектующие для автокресел, переносок и колясок; Пеленание; Питание и кормление; Приучение к горшку; Пеленки, пеленальные конверты и коконы
ja: ベビー用品: 赤ちゃん入浴用品; ベビーギフトセット; ベビー用健康・衛生用品; ベビー用安全グッズ; ベビー向けおもちゃ; ベビー用外出用品; ベビー用外出小物; ベビーカーの交換部品; おむつ用品; 授乳・離乳食; トイレトレーニング; おくるみ用毛布
zh-CN: 婴幼儿用品: 婴儿洗浴用品; 婴儿礼品套装; 婴儿卫生; 婴儿安全用品; 婴儿玩具/活动设备; 婴儿出行用品; 婴幼儿出行用品配件; 婴幼儿出行用品替换零件; 尿布相关用品; 哺乳与喂养; 如厕训练器; 襁褓/婴儿包毯
de: Baby & Kleinkind: Baby Badebedarf; Geschenksets für Babys; Baby Gesundheitsbedarf; Babysicherheit; Babyspielwaren; Babytransport; Babytransportzubehör; Ersatzteile für Babytransportartikel; Wickelbedarf; Stillen & Füttern; Töpfchentraining; Puckdecken & Mulltücher
fi: Vauvat ja leikki-ikäiset: Vauvan kylvetys; Vauvan lahjapakkaukset; Vauvan terveys; Vauvan turvallisuus; Vauvan lelut ja aktivointi; Vauvan kuljetus; Vauvan kuljetustarvikkeet; Vauvan kuljetusvälineiden varaosat; Vaippatarvikkeet; Imetys ja syöttäminen; Pottaharjoittelu; Harsoliinat ja kapalot
sk-SK: Bábätká: Kúpanie bábätiek; Detské darčekové súpravy; Zdravotné pomôcky pre bábätká; Bezpečnosť detí; Detské hračky a vybavenie na interaktívne hry; Preprava detí; Príslušenstvo na prepravu detí; Náhradné diely na prepravu detí; Prebaľovanie; Dojčenie a kŕmenie; Tréning na nočník; Zavinovačky
cs: Děti a kojenci: Dětské koupací potřeby; Dárkové sady pro děti a batolata; Péče o děti a kojence; Potřeby pro bezpečnost dětí; Dětské hračky; Přeprava dětí; Přeprava dětí – příslušenství; Náhradní díly pro přepravu dětí; Přebalování; Kojení a krmení; Učení na nočník; Peřinky a zavinovačky